Utah statutes.
75-5-419.   Accounts.
Every conservator must account to the court for his administration of the
trust upon his resignation or removal and at other times as the court may
direct. On termination of the protected person's minority or disability, a
conservator may account to the court, or he may account to the former
protected person or his personal representative. Subject to appeal or vacation
within the time permitted, an order, made upon notice and hearing, allowing an
intermediate account of a conservator, adjudicates as to his liabilities
concerning the matters considered in connection with this account, and an
order, made upon notice and hearing, allowing a final account adjudicates as
to all previously unsettled liabilities of the conservator to the protected
person or his successors relating to the conservatorship. In connection with
any account, the court may require a conservator to submit to a physical check
of the estate in his control, to be made in any manner the court may specify.
